Maryland, session 2025, HB0226.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–103.
(a) Except as provided in subsections (b), (e), [and] (f), AND (G) of this section,
each public school under the jurisdiction of a county board:
– 1 –

Ch. 346 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) (i) Shall be open for pupil attendance for at least 180 actual school
days and a minimum of 1,080 school hours during a 10–month period in each school year;
or
(ii) If normal school attendance is prevented because of conditions
described in subsection (b) of this section, shall be open for at least 1,080 hours during a
10–month period;
(2) Shall be open for pupil attendance a minimum of 3 hours during each
school day; and
(3) May not be open on Saturdays, Sundays, or holidays in order to meet
the 180–day or 1,080–hour requirement of this subsection.
(b) (1) If a county board submits a written application to the State Board that
describes a demonstrated effort by the county board to comply with subsection (a) of this
section, the State Board may permit:
(i) The following adjustments:
1. An increase in the length of the school year; or
2. A decrease in the length of the school year;
(ii) Exceptions from the requirement that the school year be
completed within a 10–month period;
(iii) Adjustments in the length of the school day; and
(iv) Schools to be open on holidays.
(2) These adjustments may be granted only if normal school attendance is
prevented because of:
(i) Natural disaster;
(ii) Civil disaster; or
(iii) Severe weather conditions.
(3) Education funding from State or local sources may not be reduced if
there are less than 180 school days in any year because of an approved application under
paragraph (1)(i)2 of this subsection.
(4) In case of emergency, the State Board may open schools on holidays.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 346
(d) Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, the State Board shall
divide the school year into the terms it considers appropriate.
(e) (1) The county boards of Allegany, Anne Arundel, Calvert, Howard,
Montgomery, and Prince George’s counties, and the Board of School Commissioners of
Baltimore City, may elect to operate one or more schools within the county or Baltimore
City on a year–round basis, provided that the 180–day and the minimum hour
requirements under this section are met.
(2) Nothing in this section precludes a county board from conducting a
year–round pilot study or program that is funded by the county board.
(F) (1) THE IN THIS SUBSECTION, “MINIMAL HOURS OF ATTENDANCE”
MEANS THE MINIMUM HOURS OF ATTENDANCE FOR THE SCHOOL YEAR REQUIRED
UNDER COMAR 13A.03.02.12, IN EFFECT ON JULY 1, 2025.
(2) SUBJECT TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION MAY ELECT TO OPERATE ONE OR
MORE ALL OF THE SCHOOLS WITHIN THE COUNTY USING A SCHEDULING MODEL
THAT ELIMINATES EARLY DISMISSAL DAYS TO ALLOW FOR LESS THAN 180 SCHOOL
DAYS IF THE MINIMUM 1,080–HOUR REQUIREMENT UNDER THIS SECTION IS
MINIMAL HOURS OF ATTENDANCE ARE MET.
(3) IF THE ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION ELECTS
TO USE A SCHEDULING MODEL THAT ELIMINATES EARLY DISMISSAL DAYS IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION, THE COUNTY BOARD MUST USE THE
SCHEDULING MODEL FOR ALL SCHOOLS IN THE COUNTY.
(4) IF THE ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION USES A
SCHEDULING MODEL THAT RESULTS IN A SCHOOL IN THE COUNTY BEING OPEN FOR
LESS THAN 180 DAYS, THE COUNTY BOARD SHALL OFFER SCHOOL EMPLOYEES WHO
RECEIVE PAY AT AN HOURLY RATE AN OPPORTUNITY TO MAKE UP THE LOST WAGES
THROUGH OTHER DUTIES BEFORE THE BEGINNING OF THE NEXT SCHOOL YEAR.
[(f)] (G) Publicly funded half–day prekindergarten programs are not subject to
the requirements of subsection (a) of this section.
[(g)] (H) Notwithstanding any other law and subject only to this section, each
county board annually shall set the start and end dates of the school year for schools in the
county.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) On or before June 30, 2026, and on or before June 30, 2027, the Anne Arundel
County Board of Education shall report to the State Board of Education and, in accordance
– 3 –

Ch. 346 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, to the General Assembly on the operation
of schools during the preceding school year that used an alternative scheduling model in
accordance with Section 1 of this Act.
(b) The reports required under this section shall include a summary of each day
a school operating under an alternative scheduling model was open and the number of
hours per day that the school was open with students in attendance.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
July 1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and, at the end of June 30,
2027, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated
and of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 4 –